Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2381.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1543(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1543. Driving while operating privilege is suspended or revoked.(a) Offense defined.--Except as provided in [subsection (b)] subsections (a.1) and (b), any person who drives a motor vehicle on any highway or trafficway of this Commonwealth after the commencement of a suspension, revocation or cancellation of the operating privilege and before the operating privilege has been restored is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction or adjudication of delinquency, be sentenced to pay a fine of $200.1234567891011121314151617181920 (a.1) Penalties for subsequent offenses.--(1) A person convicted of a second or third violation of subsection (a) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $500 but not more than $2,500.(2) A person convicted of a fourth or subsequent offense under subsection (a) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $2,500 and to undergo a term of imprisonment for not less than 30 days but not more than 12 months.* * *Section 2. Section 6503(a) and (a.1) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 6503. Subsequent convictions of certain offenses.(a) General offenses.--Every person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of any of the following provisions shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $200 nor more than $1,000 or to imprisonment for not more than six months, or both:[Section 1543(a) (relating to driving while operating privilege is suspended or revoked) except as set forth in subsection (a.1).]Section 3734 (relating to driving without lights to avoid identification or arrest).Section 3748 (relating to false reports).[(a.1) Certain repeat offenses.--A person convicted of a sixth or subsequent offense under section 1543(a) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $1,000 and to imprisonment for not less than 30 days but not more than six months.]* * *20260HB2381PN3183 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2381PN3183 - 3 - 1